Washington statutes.
RCW 32.34.040

Savings bank holding companies—Savings bank subsidiaries.

(1) No savings bank having capital stock may establish a holding company to own all its stock without the approval of the director. Upon tender of their shares of the converted savings bank, the shareholders of the savings bank shall receive all the shares of the holding company which are outstanding at the time of this tender.

(2) Any company owning more than twenty-five percent of the outstanding voting stock of a savings bank doing business under this Title 32 RCW shall, in addition to the restrictions of RCW 32.32.228, be subject to regulation as a savings bank holding company. Any savings bank holding company which is not subject to regulation by the federal reserve board or the federal home loan bank board, and all holding company subsidiaries engaging in businesses which are not subject to regulation or licensing by the federal home loan bank board, the director, the commissioner of insurance, or the administrator authorized to regulate loan companies doing business under Title 31 RCW, will be subject to such regulation of accounting practices and of the qualifications of directors and officers, and such inspection and visitation by the director as the director shall deem appropriate, subject to the limitations imposed on regulation, inspection, and visitation of a savings bank under this title. In addition, any savings bank holding company and all holding company subsidiaries will be subject to visitation by the director as such shall deem appropriate, subject to the limitations imposed on visitation of a savings bank under this Title 32 RCW and under the supremacy clause of the Constitution of the United States. The savings bank subsidiary of this holding corporation may engage in subsequent mergers, consolidations, acquisitions, and conversions, only to the extent authorized by RCW 32.32.500, and only upon complying with the applicable requirements in RCW 32.34.030 and this chapter.

(3) In the event a savings bank forms a subsidiary to carry out any of the powers of savings banks under this title, any institution with which this subsidiary merges shall continue to be subject to regulation, inspection, and visitation by the director if the subsidiary is authorized to do business by Title 33 RCW.

[ 1994 c 92 s 408; 1985 c 56 s 34.]